Utah statutes.
62A-6-113.   Appeal to Supreme Court -- Stay.
Any party to a proceeding under this chapter may file a notice of appeal from
any adverse decision with the Supreme Court in accordance with Rule 73, Utah
Rules of Civil Procedure.  The pendency of an appeal in the Supreme Court
shall stay the proceedings until the appeal is finally determined.
